Missouri, session 2026, HB2916.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.412, to read as follows:
9.412. The month of September each year is hereby designated as "Brain
2 Aneurysm Awareness Month" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
3 participate in appropriate events and activities to raise awareness about the causes of
4 and treatments for brain aneurysms, which affect nearly two hundred thousand people
5 each year.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.